sl-SI: Število smeri stikala: Dvojni preklop (DT); Enojni preklop (ST); Trojni preklop (3T); Drugo
nl: Aantal schakelaarstanden: Double-throw (DT); Single-throw (ST); Triple-throw (3T); Overig
hr-HR: Broj prebacivanja prekidača: S dva položaja (DT); S jednim položajem (ST); S tri položaja (3T); Ostalo
sv: Antal kastlägen: Tvåvägs (DT); Envägs (ST); Trevägs (3T); Övrigt
en: Number of switch throws: Double throw (DT); Single throw (ST); Triple throw (3T); Other
es: Cantidad de posiciones del interruptor: Doble tiro (DT); Tiro único (ST); Triple tiro (3T); Otro
hu: Kapcsolóállások száma: Kétáramkörös (DT); Egyáramkörös (ST); Háromáramkörös (3T); Egyéb
tr: Anahtar atış sayısı: Çift yönlü (DT); Tek yönlü (ST); Üç yönlü (3T); Diğer
cs: Počet přepnutí spínače: Dvojitý (DT); Jednoduchý (ST); Trojitý (3T); Ostatní
de: Anzahl der Schaltstellungen: Zwei Wege (DT); Ein Weg (ST); Drei Wege (3T); Andere
ja: スイッチの投入回数: 双投 (DT); 単投 (ST); 3投 (3T); その他
ro-RO: Numărul de acționări ale comutatorului: Cu dublă aruncare (DT); Simplă comutare (ST); Triplă comutare (3T); Altele
th: จำนวนการโยกสวิตช์: สองทาง (DT); ทางเดียว (ST); สามทาง (3T); อื่นๆ
ko: 스위치 스로 수: 쌍투(DT); 단투(ST); 3투(3T); 기타
fr: Nombre de voies de commutation: Bidirectionnel (DT); Unidirectionnel (ST); Tridirectionnel (3T); Autre
pl: Liczba pozycji przełącznika: Dwupołożeniowy (DT); Jednopołożeniowy (ST); Trójpołożeniowy (3T); Inne
zh-CN: 开关掷数: 双掷 (DT); 单掷 (ST); 三掷 (3T); 其他
pt-BR: Lançamentos do interruptor número: Duplo percurso (DT); Percurso único (ST); Percurso triplo (3T); Outro
fi: Kytkimen kytkentäasentojen määrä: Kaksisuuntainen (DT); Yksisuuntainen (ST); Kolmisuuntainen (3T); Muu
nb: Antall bryterposisjoner: Dobbeltvender (DT); Enkeltvender (ST); Trippelvender (3T); Annet
zh-TW: 開關擲數: 雙擲 (DT); 單擲 (ST); 三擲 (3T); 其他
it: Numero di vie del commutatore: Doppia via (DT); Singola via (ST); Tripla via (3T); Altro
sk-SK: Počet prepnutí spínača: Dvojcestný (DT); Jednocestný (ST); Trojcestný (3T); Iný
vi: Số lần chuyển công tắc: Hai vị trí (DT); Một vị trí (ST); Ba vị trí (3T); Khác
el: Αριθμός στροφών διακόπτη: Διπλή μεταγωγή (DT); Μονή μεταγωγή (ST); Τριπλή μεταγωγή (3T); Άλλο
lt-LT: Jungiklio padėčių skaičius: Dviejų krypčių (DT); Vienos krypties (ST); Trijų krypčių (3T); Kita
pt-PT: Número de acionamentos do interruptor: Via dupla (DT); Via única (ST); Via tripla (3T); Outro
ru: Количество положений переключателя: На два направления (DT); На одно направление (ST); На три направления (3T); Другое
da: Antal kontaktpositioner: Double throw (DT); Single throw (ST); Triple throw (3T); Andet
bg-BG: Брой позиции на превключване: Двупозиционен (DT); Еднопозиционен (ST); Трипозиционен (3T); Друго